Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 7. Unfair Cigarette Sales.

Sec. 43.50.710.
Sale at less than minimum price; rebate in price.

A wholesaler or retailer may not, with intent to injure competitors or destroy or substantially lessen competition,

advertise, offer to sell, or sell, at retail or wholesale, cigarettes at less than the minimum price determined by the department under

AS

43.50.810(a)

for a sale at wholesale; or

AS

43.50.810(b)

for a sale at retail; or

offer a rebate in price, give a rebate in price, offer a concession of any kind, or give a concession of any kind or nature in connection with the sale of cigarettes.

A retailer may not induce or attempt to induce or procure or attempt to procure

the purchase of cigarettes at a price less than the wholesale minimum price determined under AS

43.50.810(a)

;

a rebate or concession of any kind or nature in connection with the purchase of cigarettes.

Evidence of advertisement, offering to sell, or sale of cigarettes by a wholesaler or retailer at less than the applicable minimum price determined by the department under AS

43.50.810

, or evidence of an offer of a rebate in the price, the giving of a rebate in price, offer of a concession, or the giving of a concession of any kind or nature in connection with the sale of cigarettes, or the inducing, attempt to induce, the procuring, or the attempt to procure the purchase of cigarettes at a price less than the applicable minimum price determined by the department under AS

43.50.810

is prima facie evidence of intent to injure competitors and to destroy or substantially lessen competition.

Nothing in this section prohibits a manufacturer from offering promotions to a wholesaler or a retailer if the wholesale promotion is the same for all participating wholesalers and the retail promotion is the same for all participating retailers.

A wholesaler or retailer who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 32 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 114 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 2004, at which time what was formerly subsection (d) was relettered as (e).

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 43.50.720.
Sale at less than minimum price; sale with gift or concession.

In all advertisements, offers for sale, or sales involving two or more items when at least one of the items is cigarettes at a combined price, and in all advertisements, offers for sale, or sales involving the giving of any gift, concession, or coupon of any kind in conjunction with the sale of cigarettes, the wholesaler’s or retailer’s combined selling price may not be less than the applicable minimum price determined by the department under AS

43.50.810

of the total of all articles, products, commodities, gifts, and concessions included in the transactions, except that, if any articles, products, commodities, gifts, or concessions are not cigarettes, the price shall be the applicable minimum price determined by the department under AS

43.50.810

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 33 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am § 4 ch 114 SLA 2010)

Sec. 43.50.730.
Sale to another wholesaler. [Repealed, § 8 ch 114 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 43.50.740.
Manufacturer price list.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 114 SLA 2010.]

[Repealed, § 43 ch 1 FSSLA 2004.]

A manufacturer whose product is sold in the state directly or through an intermediary shall provide the department with a current price list for all brands of cigarettes of the manufacturer and shall notify the department at least three days before a price change takes effect.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 43 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am §§ 5, 8 ch 114 SLA 2010)

Sec. 43.50.750.
Contracts in violation of law are illegal.

A contract, express or implied, made by a person in violation of the provisions of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

is illegal and void.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Secs. 43.50.760,
43.50.770.
Determination of cost; determination of cost of cigarettes purchased outside of ordinary channels of trade. [Repealed, § 8 ch 114 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 43.50.780.
Injunction.

The department or a person injured by a violation or who would suffer from any threatened violation of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

may maintain an action to prevent, restrain, or enjoin the violation or threatened violation. If, in the action, a violation or threatened violation of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

is established, the court may enjoin and restrain or otherwise prohibit the violation or threatened violation, and the court shall assess the costs of reasonable attorney fees against the defendant. In the action, it is not necessary that actual damages to the plaintiff be alleged or proved, but, if actual damages are alleged and proved, the plaintiff, in addition to injunctive relief and costs, including reasonable attorney fees, may recover actual damages.

If injunctive relief is not requested or required, a person injured by a violation of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

may maintain an action for damages in the appropriate court.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.50.790.
Administration of AS 43.50.710 — 43.50.849; regulations.

The department

shall administer AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

;

may adopt regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

;

shall determine the applicable minimum price for cigarettes sold by a wholesaler or retailer as provided in AS

43.50.810

;

may, after reasonable notice and hearing, revoke or suspend a license issued under AS

43.50.010

or

43.50.035

to a person who refuses or neglects to comply with a provision of AS 43.50.710 — 43.50.849.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may, after reasonable notice and hearing, revoke or suspend a license issued under AS

43.70.075

to a person who refuses or neglects to comply with a provision of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 36 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am § 6 ch 114 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.50.800.
Presumptions applicable to determination of cost. [Repealed, § 8 ch 114 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 43.50.810.
Minimum prices for cigarette sales.

For the purposes of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

, the department shall determine the minimum price for which a wholesaler may advertise, offer to sell, or sell cigarettes at wholesale by applying the following formula:

For the purposes of AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

, the department shall determine the minimum price for which a retailer or wholesaler may advertise, offer to sell, or sell cigarettes at retail by multiplying by 1.04 the wholesale minimum price determined under (a) of this section.

Wholesale Minimum Price = 1.02(M — D + T),

where M = the manufacturer’s list price;

D = trade discounts; and

T = the full face value of all cigarette taxes.

History.

(§ 7 ch 114 SLA 2010)

Sec. 43.50.845.
Short title for AS 43.50.710 — 43.50.849.

AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

may be known as the Unfair Cigarette Sales Tax Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 1, ch. 109, SLA 2003, and codified in 2003.

Sec. 43.50.849.
Definitions.

In AS

43.50.710

—

43.50.849

,

“cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

;

“department” means the Department of Revenue;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

;

“retailer” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

and includes a person licensed or required to be licensed as a direct-buying retailer under this chapter and a person who holds or is required to hold a license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

;

“sale” has the meaning given in AS

43.50.170

;

“sell at retail,” “sale at retail,” or “retail sales” means a sale for consumption or use made in the ordinary course of trade or usual conduct of the seller’s business;

“sell at wholesale,” “sale at wholesale,” or “wholesale sales” means a sale made in the ordinary course of trade or usual conduct by a wholesaler to a retailer for the purpose of resale;

“trade discount” means a price reduction that is offered by a cigarette manufacturer on the date of sale, is reflected on the invoice as a deduction from the manufacturer’s list price, and is fully earned and determinable on the date of sale;

“wholesaler” means a person licensed or required to be licensed under AS

43.50.010

or AS

43.50.035

and who sells cigarettes to a retailer for the purpose of resale.

History.

(§ 19 ch 109 SLA 2003; am § 43 ch 1 FSSLA 2004; am § 8 ch 114 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, paragraphs in this section were renumbered to conform to 2004 and 2010 repeals of paragraphs.